District of Columbia statutes.
10-226

Transfer of equipment, etc., of Community Center and Playgrounds Department.

All equipment, machinery, supplies, and materials of the Community Center and Playgrounds Department shall, on the effective date of this chapter, be transferred to the Board.

History

Apr. 29, 1942, 56 Stat. 264, ch. 265, art. III, § 6

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 8-226.
1973 Ed., § 8-219.

References in Text

The words “effective date of this chapter”, appearing in this section, mean 30 days from the date of its approval.

Editor's Notes

Recreation Board abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 10-201.